Louisiana, session 2026, HB311.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1476(A)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1476. Assessments against insurers; dedications
A.
* * *
(2) In every year, In Fiscal Year 2027-2028 and 2028-2029, an amount equal
to three hundredths of one percent and in Fiscal Year 2029-2030 and each fiscal year
thereafter, an amount equal to two three and one-half hundredths of one percent of
the direct gross premiums received in the state, by insurers doing business in this
state and subject to this Subpart, less returned premiums shall be deposited by the
commissioner of insurance with the state treasurer to be credited to a special agency
account, created in the state treasury entitled the Municipal Fire and Police Civil
Service Operating Dedicated Fund Account, to be known as the "account". Subject
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-673 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 311
to an annual appropriation by the legislature pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
33:2480 and 2540, monies in the account shall be used solely to support the
operations of the office of state examiner, Municipal Fire and Police Civil Service.
Monies in the account shall be invested by the treasurer in the same manner as
monies in the state general fund and interest earned on investment of these monies
shall be credited to the state general fund. All unexpended and unencumbered
monies in the account at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the account.
Funding deposited into the account shall be considered fees and self-generated
revenues and shall be available for annual appropriations by the legislature.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.